public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
superior/DX	po:adjective po:noun
altro/BX	po:quantifier
sol/BX	po:preposition po:adjective po:adverb
òto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
nove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dièxe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
úndexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dódexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trédexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuatòrdexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuíndexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sédexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexsète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexesète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixsète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixesète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexdòto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexedòto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixdòto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixedòto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexnove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexenove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexnòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexenòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixnove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixenove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixnòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixenòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
vinti/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trenta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuaranta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧinkuanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sinkuanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sesanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
setanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
novanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
doxento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
doŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dosento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trexento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
treŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
tresento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuatroŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuatrosento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧinkueŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sinkuesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sieŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
siesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
seteŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
setesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otoŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otosento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
novesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
miƚe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
meƚion/U%	po:numeral_cardenal
miƚion/U%	po:numeral_cardenal
meƚiardo/U%	po:numeral_cardenal
miƚiardo/U%	po:numeral_cardenal
I/£Z	po:numeral_latin
V/£Z	po:numeral_latin
X/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XXX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
L/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
C/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
D/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
M/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
invernaƚe/V	po:adjective
èko/R	po:adverb po:interjection
èkolo/S	po:adverb po:interjection
èkoƚo/S	po:adverb po:interjection
òro/U	po:noun po:interjection
àmolo/UI	po:noun
èra/V	po:noun
xóvane/V	po:noun po:adjective
đenòco/U	po:noun
xogador/CW	po:noun
đornal/V	po:noun
ŧúkaro/U	po:noun
sarexèr/BW	po:noun
sariexèr/BW	po:noun
ŧedron/V	po:noun
ŧopèla/V	po:noun
ɉévero/U	po:noun
alpe/V	po:noun
amoƚèr/BW	po:noun
ano/U	po:noun
antigo/BX	po:adjective
armelinèr/NW	po:noun
armeƚinèr/NW	po:noun
arna/V	po:noun
bòkol/U	po:noun
baƚon/V	po:noun po:adjective
barkarol/BW	po:noun
bavaroƚo/UW	po:noun
beƚesa/V	po:noun
biavèr/UW	po:noun
bondanŧa/V	po:noun
botin/U	po:noun
brespèr/BW	po:noun
brinŧia/V	po:noun
bronsèr/UW	po:noun
círmol/U	po:noun
caro/BX	po:noun po:adjective
deŧimal/V	po:adjective
dio/U	po:noun
diritura/V	po:adverb
dolŧo/BIX	po:adjective
dolso/BIX	po:adjective
dudolèr/BW	po:noun
eskluxivo/BX	po:adjective
fàŧil/DX	po:adjective
fàsil/DX	po:adjective
fàsiƚe/DX	po:adjective
fàbrega/V	po:noun
fasoƚeto/UI	po:noun
fagèr/BW	po:noun
faxoƚèr/BW	po:noun
fegura/V	po:noun
fiorin/U	po:noun
fontanèr/BW	po:noun
forsaura/V	po:noun
fornidor/CW	po:noun
fragolèr/BW	po:noun
frutarol/BW	po:noun
fugasa/V	po:noun
gabiòto/UI	po:noun
gaƚinèr/BW	po:noun
genga/V	po:noun
gropoƚoxo/U	po:adjective
indòrmia/V	po:noun
intrigon/V	po:noun
inventario/U	po:noun
kòka/V	po:noun
kaxòto/UI	po:noun
kakèr/BW	po:noun
kaldo/BXI	po:adjective po:noun
kalkera/V	po:noun
kalkoƚador/CW	po:adjective po:noun
kapeƚèr/BW	po:noun
kaponera/V	po:noun
kapovèrso/U	po:noun
karegèr/BW	po:noun
kaveŧa/V	po:noun
kaxèr/UW	po:noun
kivo/U	po:noun
konsakarèga/V	po:noun
kordon/U	po:noun
koridor/CW	po:adjective po:noun
kornoƚèr/BW	po:noun
kreanŧa/V	po:noun
kuadratin/U	po:noun
kuartaròl/UW	po:noun
làrexe/VI	po:noun
ƚaso/UI	po:noun
ƚavador/CW	po:noun
lavandèra/V	po:noun
ƚavorador/CW	po:noun
ƚeñèr/BW	po:noun
ƚedamèr/U	po:noun po:adjective
ƚibrèr/BW	po:noun
lidial/V	po:noun
lion/U	po:noun
luxe/V	po:noun
masòto/UI	po:noun
malamente/IY	po:adverb
maƚamente/IY	po:adverb
malegraŧia/V	po:noun
marka/V	po:noun
mateŧo/UI	po:adjective
merkanŧía/V	po:noun
metaƚenguaxo/U	po:noun
mexurador/CW	po:noun
molinèr/BW	po:noun
monèa/V	po:noun
morèr/BW	po:noun
nènia/V	po:noun
nòtol/U	po:noun
naranŧèr/BW	po:noun
noxeƚèr/BW	po:noun
numeraƚe/V	po:adjective
orbexígoƚo/U	po:noun po:adjective
pàxena/V	po:noun
pòco/U	po:noun
paƚòta/V	po:noun
paludo/U	po:noun
partexèla/V	po:noun
paso/U	po:noun
piasa/V	po:noun
pioƚet/U	po:noun
pitèr/BW	po:noun
ponteđaura/V	po:noun
prà/U	po:noun
precixo/BX	po:adjective
premesa/V	po:noun
primarol/BW	po:noun
règoƚa/V	po:noun
raforsamento/U	po:noun
raro/BX	po:adjective
redoxega/V	po:noun
regolar/VX	po:adjective
regoƚar/VX	po:adjective
rodèƚa/V	po:noun
romito/UI	po:noun
saƚador/CW	po:noun
saldo/U	po:adjective po:noun
señaƚador/CW	po:noun
semi-naxal/V	po:adjective
sentimento/U	po:noun
skarpon/U	po:noun
skarsèƚa/V	po:noun
solŧaròl/UW	po:noun
soƚo/BX	po:adjective po:adverb
sorafin/U	po:adjective
spesièr/BW	po:noun
spenton/V	po:noun
springaorto/UI	po:noun
stranbería/V	po:noun
suxinèr/BW	po:noun
tèma/U	po:noun
teoría/V	po:noun
tersadin/U	po:noun
ultimo/BX	po:adjective po:noun
vaja/U	po:noun
veja/V	po:noun
vokàƚego/U	po:adjective
xguèlto/U	po:adjective
aba/V	po:noun
akuarèƚo/U	po:noun
kaŧador/CW	po:noun
inkanto/U	po:noun
angurièr/BW	po:noun
anguxigola/V	po:noun
antianèƚo/U	po:noun
arđentièr/BW	po:noun
arđigògolo/U	po:noun
difexa/V	po:noun
baño/U	po:noun
balonèr/BW	po:noun
barakon/V	po:noun
barador/CW	po:noun
barónsoƚo/U	po:noun
seƚèr/BW	po:noun
imèga/V	po:noun
bekafigo/U	po:noun
bigolèr/BW	po:noun
bilanso/U	po:noun
bískolo/UX	po:noun
boarol/BW	po:noun
boletin/U	po:noun
bolŧèr/BW	po:noun
bonbaxina/V	po:noun
ancipresèr/BW	po:noun
olmèr/BW	po:noun
roverèr/BW	po:noun
róere/U	po:noun
botiđador/BW	po:noun
brasièr/BW	po:noun
brespon/V	po:noun
bròkoƚo/U	po:noun
frutèr/BW	po:noun
bucintòro/U	po:noun
bugarol/BW	po:noun
busolaeto/U	po:noun
busolèr/BW	po:noun
